Louisiana, session 2026, HB704.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 30:2418(G) and (I)(1)(a)(i) through (iii) are hereby amended and
reenacted and R.S. 30:2418(H)(11) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2418. Waste tires; Waste Tire Management Dedicated Fund Account
* * *
G.(1) There is hereby established a statutorily dedicated fund account in the
state treasury to be known as the "Waste Tire Management Dedicated Fund
Account", hereafter referred to in this Section as the "account". Any fees collected,
pursuant to the secretary's rules and regulations, on the sale of tires, and any other
appropriations, gifts, grants, or other monies received by the Department of
Environmental Quality for the credit of the account, shall be remitted to the state
treasury and credited to the Bond Security and Redemption Fund, as provided by the
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1269 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 704
laws of this state and the Constitution of Louisiana. After a sufficient amount is
allocated from the Bond Security and Redemption Fund to pay all obligations
secured by the full faith and credit of the state which become due and payable within
any fiscal year, the treasurer shall pay into the account an amount equal to the total
amount previously deposited into the treasury. All interest earned on money from
the account and invested by the state treasurer shall be credited to the account. The
monies in the account shall be administered by the secretary solely for the purposes
of solving the state's waste tire problem. No monies from the account shall be used
to provide payments to waste tire processors for processing tires that are generated
in Louisiana when those tires are processed in any other state. Monies deposited into
the account shall be categorized as fees and self-generated revenue for the sole
purpose of reporting related to the executive budget, supporting documents, and
general appropriation bills and shall be available for annual appropriation by the
legislature.
(2) Out of the fees collected pursuant to Subsection I of this Section, one
dollar collected from each tire sale shall be used to administer a tire buy back
program.
H. The secretary shall promulgate rules, regulations, and guidelines for the
administration and enforcement of the waste tire program provided for in this
Chapter, which shall be subject to legislative review and approval by the Senate
Committee on Environmental Quality and the House Committee on Natural
Resources and Environment. The rules, regulations, and guidelines shall provide for
but not be limited to:
* * *
(11) Creating and implementing a tire buy back program, to be funded as
provided in Paragraph G(2) of this Section.
I.(1)(a) The fee on tires authorized to be levied pursuant to R.S.
30:2413(A)(8) shall not exceed the following:
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1269 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 704
(i) Two Three dollars and twenty-five cents per passenger/light truck/small
farm service tire.
(ii) Five Six dollars per medium truck tire.
(iii) Ten Eleven dollars per off-road tire.
* * *